Missouri, session 2026, HB2131.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 571.030, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 571.030, to read as follows:
571.030. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful use of weapons, except as
otherwise provided by sections 571.101 to 571.121 and sections 571.205 to 571.230, if he or
she knowingly:
(1) Carries concealed upon or about his or her person a knife, a firearm, a blackjack
or any other weapon readily capable of lethal use [into any area where firearms are restricted
under section 571.107]; or
(2) Sets a spring gun; or
(3) Discharges or shoots a firearm into a dwelling house, a railroad train, boat,
aircraft, or motor vehicle as defined in section 302.010, or any building or structure used for
the assembling of people; or
(4) Exhibits, in the presence of one or more persons, any weapon readily capable of
lethal use in an angry or threatening manner; or
(5) Has a firearm or projectile weapon readily capable of lethal use on his or her
person, while he or she is intoxicated, and handles or otherwise uses such firearm or projectile
weapon in either a negligent or unlawful manner or discharges such firearm or projectile
weapon unless acting in self-defense; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2131 2
(6) Discharges a firearm within one hundred yards of any occupied schoolhouse,
courthouse, or church building; or
(7) Discharges or shoots a firearm at a mark, at any object, or at random, on, along or
across a public highway or discharges or shoots a firearm into any outbuilding; or
(8) Carries a firearm or any other weapon readily capable of lethal use into any
church or place where people have assembled for worship, or into any election precinct on
any election day, or into any building owned or occupied by any agency of the federal
government, state government, or political subdivision thereof; or
(9) Discharges or shoots a firearm at or from a motor vehicle, as defined in section
301.010, discharges or shoots a firearm at any person, or at any other motor vehicle, or at any
building or habitable structure, unless the person was lawfully acting in self-defense; or
(10) Carries a firearm, whether loaded or unloaded, or any other weapon readily
capable of lethal use into any school, onto any school bus, or onto the premises of any
function or activity sponsored or sanctioned by school officials or the district school board; or
(11) Possesses a firearm while also knowingly in possession of a controlled substance
that is sufficient for a felony violation of section 579.015.
2. Subdivisions (1), (8), and (10) of subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to the
persons described in this subsection, regardless of whether such uses are reasonably
associated with or are necessary to the fulfillment of such person's official duties except as
otherwise provided in this subsection. Subdivisions (3), (4), (6), (7), and (9) of subsection 1
of this section shall not apply to or affect any of the following persons, when such uses are
reasonably associated with or are necessary to the fulfillment of such person's official duties,
except as otherwise provided in this subsection:
(1) All state, county and municipal peace officers who have completed the training
required by the police officer standards and training commission pursuant to sections 590.030
to 590.050 and who possess the duty and power of arrest for violation of the general criminal
laws of the state or for violation of ordinances of counties or municipalities of the state,
whether such officers are on or off duty, and whether such officers are within or outside of the
law enforcement agency's jurisdiction, or all qualified retired peace officers, as defined in
subsection 12 of this section, and who carry the identification defined in subsection 13 of this
section, or any person summoned by such officers to assist in making arrests or preserving the
peace while actually engaged in assisting such officer;
(2) Wardens, superintendents and keepers of prisons, penitentiaries, jails and other
institutions for the detention of persons accused or convicted of crime;
(3) Members of the Armed Forces or National Guard while performing their official
duty;

HB 2131 3
(4) Those persons vested by Article V, Section 1 of the Constitution of Missouri with
the judicial power of the state and those persons vested by Article III of the Constitution of
the United States with the judicial power of the United States, the members of the federal
judiciary;
(5) Any person whose bona fide duty is to execute process, civil or criminal;
(6) Any federal probation officer or federal flight deck officer as defined under the
federal flight deck officer program, 49 U.S.C. Section 44921, regardless of whether such
officers are on duty, or within the law enforcement agency's jurisdiction;
(7) Any state probation or parole officer, including supervisors and members of the
parole board;
(8) Any corporate security advisor meeting the definition and fulfilling the
requirements of the regulations established by the department of public safety under section
590.750;
(9) Any coroner, deputy coroner, medical examiner, or assistant medical examiner;
(10) Any municipal or county prosecuting attorney or assistant prosecuting attorney;
circuit attorney or assistant circuit attorney; municipal, associate, or circuit judge; or any
person appointed by a court to be a special prosecutor who has completed the firearms safety
training course required under subsection 2 of section 571.111;
(11) Any member of a fire department or fire protection district who is employed on a
full-time basis as a fire investigator and who has a valid concealed carry endorsement issued
prior to August 28, 2013, or a valid concealed carry permit under section 571.111 when such
uses are reasonably associated with or are necessary to the fulfillment of such person's official
duties; and
(12) Upon the written approval of the governing body of a fire department or fire
protection district, any paid fire department or fire protection district member who is
employed on a full-time basis and who has a valid concealed carry endorsement issued prior
to August 28, 2013, or a valid concealed carry permit, when such uses are reasonably
associated with or are necessary to the fulfillment of such person's official duties.
3. Subdivisions (1), (5), (8), and (10) of subsection 1 of this section do not apply
when the actor is transporting such weapons in a nonfunctioning state or in an unloaded state
when ammunition is not readily accessible or when such weapons are not readily accessible.
Subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section does not apply to any person nineteen years of
age or older or eighteen years of age or older and a member of the United States Armed
Forces, or honorably discharged from the United States Armed Forces, transporting a
concealable firearm in the passenger compartment of a motor vehicle, so long as such
concealable firearm is otherwise lawfully possessed, nor when the actor is also in possession
of an exposed firearm or projectile weapon for the lawful pursuit of game, or is in his or her

HB 2131 4
dwelling unit or upon premises over which the actor has possession, authority or control, or is
traveling in a continuous journey peaceably through this state. Subdivision (10) of subsection
1 of this section does not apply if the firearm is otherwise lawfully possessed by a person
while traversing school premises for the purposes of transporting a student to or from school,
or possessed by an adult for the purposes of facilitation of a school-sanctioned firearm-related
event or club event.
4. Subdivisions (1), (8), and (10) of subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to any
person who has a valid concealed carry permit issued pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121
or sections 571.205 to 571.230, a valid concealed carry endorsement issued before August
28, 2013, or a valid permit or endorsement to carry concealed firearms issued by another state
100 or political subdivision of another state.
101 5. Subdivisions (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), and (10) of subsection 1 of this section
102 shall not apply to persons who are engaged in a lawful act of defense pursuant to section
103 563.031.
104 6. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the state shall not
105 prohibit any state employee from having a firearm in the employee's vehicle on the state's
106 property provided that the vehicle is locked and the firearm is not visible. This subsection
107 shall only apply to the state as an employer when the state employee's vehicle is on property
108 owned or leased by the state and the state employee is conducting activities within the scope
109 of his or her employment. For the purposes of this subsection, "state employee" means an
110 employee of the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of the government of the state of
111 Missouri.
112 7. (1) Subdivision (10) of subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to a person who
113 is a school officer commissioned by the district school board under section 162.215 or who is
114 a school protection officer, as described under section 160.665.
115 (2) Nothing in this section shall make it unlawful for a student to actually participate
116 in school-sanctioned gun safety courses, student military or ROTC courses, or other school-
117 sponsored or club-sponsored firearm-related events, provided the student does not carry a
118 firearm or other weapon readily capable of lethal use into any school, onto any school bus, or
119 onto the premises of any other function or activity sponsored or sanctioned by school officials
120 or the district school board.
121 8. A person who commits the crime of unlawful use of weapons under:
122 (1) Subdivision (2), (3), (4), or (11) of subsection 1 of this section shall be guilty of a
123 class E felony;
124 (2) Subdivision (1), (6), (7), or (8) of subsection 1 of this section shall be guilty of a
125 class B misdemeanor[, except when a concealed weapon is carried onto any private property
126 whose owner has posted the premises as being off-limits to concealed firearms by means of

HB 2131 5
127 one or more signs displayed in a conspicuous place of a minimum size of eleven inches by
128 fourteen inches with the writing thereon in letters of not less than one inch, in which case the
129 penalties of subsection 2 of section 571.107 shall apply];
130 (3) Subdivision (5) or (10) of subsection 1 of this section shall be guilty of a class A
131 misdemeanor if the firearm is unloaded and a class E felony if the firearm is loaded;
132 (4) Subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of this section shall be guilty of a class B felony,
133 except that if the violation of subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of this section results in injury or
134 death to another person, it is a class A felony.
135 9. Violations of subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of this section shall be punished as
136 follows:
137 (1) For the first violation a person shall be sentenced to the maximum authorized term
138 of imprisonment for a class B felony;
139 (2) For any violation by a prior offender as defined in section 558.016, a person shall
140 be sentenced to the maximum authorized term of imprisonment for a class B felony without
141 the possibility of parole, probation or conditional release for a term of ten years;
142 (3) For any violation by a persistent offender as defined in section 558.016, a person
143 shall be sentenced to the maximum authorized term of imprisonment for a class B felony
144 without the possibility of parole, probation, or conditional release;
145 (4) For any violation which results in injury or death to another person, a person shall
146 be sentenced to an authorized disposition for a class A felony.
147 10. Any person knowingly aiding or abetting any other person in the violation of
148 subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of this section shall be subject to the same penalty as that
149 prescribed by this section for violations by other persons.
150 11. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person who pleads guilty to or is
151 found guilty of a felony violation of subsection 1 of this section shall receive a suspended
152 imposition of sentence if such person has previously received a suspended imposition of
153 sentence for any other firearms- or weapons-related felony offense.
154 12. As used in this section "qualified retired peace officer" means an individual who:
155 (1) Retired in good standing from service with a public agency as a peace officer,
156 other than for reasons of mental instability;
157 (2) Before such retirement, was authorized by law to engage in or supervise the
158 prevention, detection, investigation, or prosecution of, or the incarceration of any person for,
159 any violation of law, and had statutory powers of arrest;
160 (3) Before such retirement, was regularly employed as a peace officer for an
161 aggregate of fifteen years or more, or retired from service with such agency, after completing
162 any applicable probationary period of such service, due to a service-connected disability, as
163 determined by such agency;

HB 2131 6
164 (4) Has a nonforfeitable right to benefits under the retirement plan of the agency if
165 such a plan is available;
166 (5) During the most recent twelve-month period, has met, at the expense of the
167 individual, the standards for training and qualification for active peace officers to carry
168 firearms;
169 (6) Is not under the influence of alcohol or another intoxicating or hallucinatory drug
170 or substance; and
171 (7) Is not prohibited by federal law from receiving a firearm.
172 13. The identification required by subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of this section is:
173 (1) A photographic identification issued by the agency from which the individual
174 retired from service as a peace officer that indicates that the individual has, not less recently
175 than one year before the date the individual is carrying the concealed firearm, been tested or
176 otherwise found by the agency to meet the standards established by the agency for training
177 and qualification for active peace officers to carry a firearm of the same type as the concealed
178 firearm; or
179 (2) A photographic identification issued by the agency from which the individual
180 retired from service as a peace officer; and
181 (3) A certification issued by the state in which the individual resides that indicates
182 that the individual has, not less recently than one year before the date the individual is
183 carrying the concealed firearm, been tested or otherwise found by the state to meet the
184 standards established by the state for training and qualification for active peace officers to
185 carry a firearm of the same type as the concealed firearm.
✔